test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-njuovca_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - njuovčâ: # eres
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuovčâ
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuoh´čâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuoh´čâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuoh´čâmân
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuoh´čâmist
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Com: njuoh´čâmáin
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuoh´čâmttáá
    njuovčâ+N+Ess: [njuoh´čâmin, njuovčân]
    njuovčâ+N+Par: [njuoh´čâmid, njuovčâd]
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuoh´čâmeh
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Gen: njuoh´čâmij
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuoh´čâmijd
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuoh´čâmáid
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuoh´čâmijn
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Com: njuoh´čâmijguin
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuoh´čâmijttáá
